District of Columbia statutes.
10-511.03

Tunnel under Capitol Grounds and Botanic Garden grounds — Right, title and interest to remain in the United States; jurisdiction and responsibility of Mayor.

Except as provided in § 10-511.06, nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to grant to the Mayor of the District of Columbia any right, title, or interest in or to any real property of the United States, and reservation 12 shall in its entirety continue to be a part of the United States Capitol Grounds, and square W-576 shall in its entirety continue to be a part of the United States Botanic Garden grounds. The Mayor shall have jurisdiction and control of, and sole responsibility for the operation and maintenance of, those portions of the tunnel beneath square W-576 and reservation 12.

July 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 334, Pub. L. 88-381, § 3
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 9-141.
1981 Ed., § 9-137.